src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
|   Flag | Comment
| --- | --- 
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|   Flag | Comment
| --- | --- 
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

## Root lexicon

The word forms in Hill Mari start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
The assumption is that xml files with names pos.xml will provide the source material for
the initial pos.lexc _LEXICON Pos_ entries
* **adjectives ;** 
* **adpositions ;** 
* **adverbs ;** 
* **conjunctors ;** 
* **descriptives ;** 
* **interjections ;** 
* **nouns ;** 
* **particles ;** 
* **pronouns ;** 
* **propernouns ;** 
* **propernouns-toponyms ;** 
* **quantifiers ;** 
* **verbs ;** 
* **numberwords ;** 
* **Numeral ;** 
* **Punctuation ;** 
* **Symbols ;** 
* **A_NEWWORDS ;** 
* **N_NEWWORDS ;** 
* **PROP_NEWWORDS ;** 
* **Exceptions ;** 
* **urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ;** This is the template
* **LEXICON GER-en** 
* **+V+Ger: K ;** 

ENDLEX goes to # for now.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mrj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
